apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="tɩɩs na/aba__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ab</l>       <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aba</l>       <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>abã</l>       <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nams</l>     <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>namse</l>     <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>namse</l>     <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>namsã</l>     <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>namsã</l>     <r>aba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="to/aaga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>aaga</l>      <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aag</l>      <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aagã</l>      <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ose</l>       <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ose</l>       <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>osã</l>       <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>asã</l>       <r>aaga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tɩpd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tʋntʋmd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tɩpg/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l></l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tɩta-ne/da__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tɩʋʋs/go__n">
		<e>       <p><l>go</l>    <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>    <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>    <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dem</l>    <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>demã</l>    <r>go<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="toad/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>      <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>      <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="toagsd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="to/aka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ak</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>akã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gs</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tõ/aka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ak</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aka</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>akã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gs</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gse</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gsã</l>       <r>aka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tõakd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tõakd/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>      <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>      <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>       <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="toand/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="tõd/gre__n">
		<e>       <p><l>gr           </l><r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gre</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>grã</l>       <r>gre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="toe/oogo__n">
		<e>       <p><l>oog </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogo </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogo </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ed</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>edo</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>edã</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="tɩɩs naaba">      <i>tɩɩs na</i><par n="tɩɩs na/aba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩpda">           <i>tɩpd</i><par n="tɩpd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩpgo">           <i>tɩpg</i><par n="tɩpg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩta-neda">       <i>tɩta-ne</i><par n="tɩta-ne/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩʋʋsgo">         <i>tɩʋʋs</i><par n="tɩʋʋs/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toaaga">          <i>to</i><par n="to/aaga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toadga">          <i>toad</i><par n="toad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toagsda">         <i>toagsd</i><par n="toagsd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toaka">           <i>to</i><par n="to/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõaka">           <i>tõ</i><par n="tõ/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõakda">          <i>tõakd</i><par n="tõakd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõakdga">         <i>tõakd</i><par n="tõakd/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toanda">          <i>toand</i><par n="toand/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõdgre">          <i>tõd</i><par n="tõd/gre__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toeoogo">         <i>toe</i><par n="toe/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋntʋmda">        <i>tʋntʋmd</i><par n="tʋntʋmd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩɩs naaba">      <i>tɩɩs na</i><par n="tɩɩs na/aba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩpda">           <i>tɩpd</i><par n="tɩpd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩpgo">           <i>tɩpg</i><par n="tɩpg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩta-neda">       <i>tɩta-ne</i><par n="tɩta-ne/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tɩʋʋsgo">         <i>tɩʋʋs</i><par n="tɩʋʋs/go__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toaaga">          <i>to</i><par n="to/aaga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toadga">          <i>toad</i><par n="toad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toagsda">         <i>toagsd</i><par n="toagsd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toaka">           <i>to</i><par n="to/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõaka">           <i>tõ</i><par n="tõ/aka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõakda">          <i>tõakd</i><par n="tõakd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõakdga">         <i>tõakd</i><par n="tõakd/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toanda">          <i>toand</i><par n="toand/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tõdgre">          <i>tõd</i><par n="tõd/gre__n"/></e>
	<e lm="toeoogo">         <i>toe</i><par n="toe/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="tʋntʋmda">        <i>tʋntʋmd</i><par n="tʋntʋmd/a__n"/></e>
